Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-435.02
Insurer; duty to report violations.

(1) Unless such knowledge or information is based on confidential medical records protected by the confidentiality provisions of the federal Public Health Services Act, 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2, and federal administrative rules and regulations, as such act and rules and regulations existed on January 1, 2007:

(a) Any insurer having knowledge of any violation of any provision of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act governing the profession of the person being reported whether or not such person is licensed shall report the facts of such violation as known to such insurer to the department; and

(b) All insurers shall cooperate with the department and provide such information as requested by the department concerning any possible violations by any person required to be licensed whether or not such person is licensed.

(2) Such reporting shall be done on a form and in the manner specified pursuant to sections 38-1,130 and 38-1,131. Such reports shall be subject to sections 38-1,132 to 38-1,136.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1125.